District of Columbia statutes.
22-303

Malicious burning, destruction, or injury of another’s property.

Whoever maliciously injures or breaks or destroys, or attempts to injure or break or destroy, by fire or otherwise, any public or private property, whether real or personal, not his or her own, of the value of $1,000 or more, shall be fined not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01 or shall be imprisoned for not more than 10 years, or both, and if the property has some value shall be fined not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01 or imprisoned for not more than 180 days, or both.

History

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1327, ch. 854, § 848
Aug. 12, 1937, 50 Stat. 629, ch. 599
Nov. 8, 1965, 79 Stat. 1307, Pub. L. 89-347, § 1
May 21, 1994, D.C. Law 10-119, § 2(e), 41 DCR 1639
Aug. 20, 1994, D.C. Law 10-151, § 105(c), 41 DCR 2608
June 3, 2011, D.C. Law 18-377, § 7, 58 DCR 1174
June 11, 2013, D.C. Law 19-317, § 201(k), 60 DCR 2064

Section References

This section is referenced in § 22-951, § 22-3152, § 23-546, and § 23-581.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 22-403.
1973 Ed., § 22-403.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 18-377 substituted “value of $1,000 or more” for “value of $200 or more”; and substituted “if the property has some value” for “if the value of the property be less than $ 200”.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-317 substituted the first occurrence of “not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01” for “not more than $5,000” and the second occurrence of “not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01” for “not more than $1,000”.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary amendment of section, see § 105(c) of the Omnibus Criminal Justice Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 1994 (D.C. Act 10-255, June 22, 1994, 41 DCR 4286).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 507 of Public Safety Legislation Sixty-Day Layover Emergency Amendment Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-693, January 18, 2011, 58 DCR 640).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 507 of Public Safety Legislation Sixty-Day Layover Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2011 (D.C. Act 19-45, April 20, 2011, 58 DCR 3701).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 201(k) of the Criminal Fine Proportionality Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-45, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5400, 20 DCSTAT 1300).

Editor's Notes

Applicability of D.C. Law 19-317: Section 401 of D.C. Law 19-317 provided that the act shall apply only to offenses committed on or after June 11, 2013.